Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 180.21 of Title 17, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
For purposes of this act:
1. "Notice to relocate" means written notice issued by a public
entity to a utility identifying the public infrastructure project

Req. No. 16377 Page 1

and providing final approved construction plans and proof of funding
availability;
2. "Public infrastructure project" means any street, road,
bridge, drainage, water, sewer, transit, or public improvement
project funded in whole or in part by:
a. a municipality or county,
b. the State of Oklahoma, or
c. federal funds administered by a public entity;
3. "Relocation" means the removal, movement, adjustment, or
replacement of utility facilities required to accommodate a public
infrastructure project;
4. "Utility" means any private or public utility, electric
cooperative, telephone company, cable provider, pipeline company, or
other entity owning or operating utility facilities within public
rights-of-way; and
5. "Utility facility" means any privately, publicly, or
cooperatively owned line, system, or structure used to produce,
transmit, or distribute essential services, including electricity,
gas, oil, water, steam, communications, and sewage.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 180.22 of Title 17, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Req. No. 16377 Page 2

A. Upon receipt of a Notice to Relocate, a utility shall
complete all required relocation within three hundred sixty-five
(365) calendar days.
B. The three-hundred-sixty-five-day period begins upon the
utilities receipt of the Notice to Relocate.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 180.23 of Title 17, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Beginning on the three hundred sixty-sixth day, a utility
that has not completed required relocation shall be liable for
liquidated damages in the amount of Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00) per day, per project, until relocation is completed.
B. Liquidated damages under this section:
1. Represent a reasonable estimate of public delay costs;
2. Are not a penalty; and
3. May be recovered by the public entity funding the project.
C. Liquidated damages may be withheld from any relocation
reimbursement or invoiced directly to the utility.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 180.24 of Title 17, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. This act may be enforced by:
1. Any municipality or county;
2. The Department of Transportation; or
Req. No. 16377 Page 3

3. Any other public entity funding the project.
B. Enforcement actions may be brought in district court, and
prevailing public entities shall be entitled to:
1. Liquidated damages;
2. Injunctive relief; and
3. Recovery of attorney fees and court costs.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 180.25 of Title 17, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A utility may only request an extension of the three-
hundred-sixty-five-day time to relocate its facilities in writing
and for the following reasons:
1. Natural disaster or act of nature;
2. Federal permitting delays outside the utility's control;
3. Material shortages certified by at least two suppliers; or
4. Extraordinary safety hazards.
B. Extensions must be approved in writing by the public entity
and may not exceed three hundred sixty-five (365) days per public
infrastructure project.
SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16377 MJ 02/16/26


Req. No. 16377 Page 4